Utah statutes.
41-6a-1802.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Child restraint device" means a child restraint device that meets standards adopted under Section 41-6a-1601.

(2)  "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle defined in Section 41-1a-102, except vehicles that are not equipped with safety belts by the manufacturer.

(3)  "Safety belt" means a safety belt or seat belt system that meets standards adopted under Section 41-6a-1601.

(4)  "Seating position" means any area within the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle in which the manufacturer has installed a safety belt.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

